Utah statutes.
20A-4-502.   Altering vote count or returns.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person to:

(a)  willfully add to or subtract from the votes actually cast at an election in any election returns; or

(b)  alter any election returns.

(2)  Any person who violates this section may be sentenced to imprisonment in the state prison for not less than one nor more than five years.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1993 General Session

